Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1228
Department; access and inspection; powers.

The department shall have (1) authority to inspect water wells constructed, water wells decommissioned, and water well locations, (2) access to water wells and accompanying pumps and pumping equipment at all reasonable times, and (3) power of inspection in regard to the construction and decommissioning of all water wells.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 28;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 101.